Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 9 Sale of Oils [Repealed.]

6-9-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 143, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 169, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 199, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 381, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-9-1

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 5, effective December 31, 2014.

6-9-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 143, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 169, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 199, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 381, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-9-2

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 5, effective December 31, 2014.

6-9-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 143, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 169, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 199, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 381, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-9-3

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 5, effective December 31, 2014.

6-9-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 143, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 169, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 199, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 381, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

6-9-4

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 5, effective December 31, 2014.